Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 1. Location, Condemnation, and Construction

§ 3518.
Preliminary survey.

A railroad corporation may cause such examinations and surveys for a proposed railroad to be made as are necessary for the selection of the most advantageous route and, for such purpose, by its officers, agents, and employees, may enter upon lands or waters of a person, subject to liability for actual damages. Entry for other purposes shall not be made without the consent of the owner, until the damages are agreed upon by the parties, or ascertained and paid to the owner, or deposited as hereinafter provided.

§ 3519.
Location of road to be recorded.

Before a railroad corporation commences proceedings for the purpose of acquiring title to real estate or an interest in real estate, and, within two years after its incorporation, it shall cause a map or plan of the location of its road defining the courses, distances, and boundaries of the same in each town through which it passes, signed by a majority of the directors, to be recorded in the respective clerk’s offices of the towns. If the road passes through an unorganized town or gore, the location shall be recorded in the offices in which conveyances of real estate situated in that unorganized town or gore are required by law to be recorded.

HISTORY:

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3520.
Right to take land and water.

A railroad corporation may lay out its road, not exceeding five rods wide, and may purchase or otherwise take lands or materials necessary for making or securing its railroad, and such water and in such quantity as is required for the uses of the road, with the right of entering upon the land and constructing and keeping in repair necessary aqueducts.

§ 3521.
Taking for depot accommodations.

A railroad corporation may enter upon and take lands necessary for depot accommodations as provided by law and its act of incorporation.

§ 3522.
Land without road limits.

Land without the limits of its road shall not be taken by a railroad corporation for the requisite and convenient accommodation of its road, without the permission of the owner, unless the commissioners appointed as prescribed in section 3523 of this title, on application of the corporation, and after 12 days’ notice to the owner, first prescribe the limits within which such lands shall be taken.

§ 3523.
Appraisal of damages; appointment of commissioners.

When a railroad corporation has not acquired, by gift or purchase, land, real estate, or property, taken or required for the construction, maintenance, and convenient accommodation of its road, and if the parties do not agree as to the price of the land and other property, any two Justices of the Supreme Court, upon application for that purpose by the corporation, shall appoint three disinterested commissioners, one of whom shall be an inhabitant of the town and all shall be inhabitants of the county in which the land or other property to be appraised is situated, to determine the damages that the owners of the land or property have sustained by the occupation of the railroad corporation for the construction, maintenance, and convenient accommodation of its road.

HISTORY:

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3524.
Notice of time and place of appraisal.

The commissioners shall give 12 days’ notice to the occupants or owners of the land of the time and place when and where they will attend to the appraisal, but notice shall not be required to be given of the appraisal of unoccupied lands unless the owner resides in the State or has some known agent or attorney residing in the State. If the owner does not reside in the State, and has a known agent or attorney residing in the State, the same notice shall be given to the agent or attorney as is directed to be given to the owner or occupant.

HISTORY:

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3525.
Description of land and property.

At least ten days before an appraisal is made by the commissioners, the corporation shall deliver to the owner, or deposit in the clerk’s office in the town in which the same lies, a plan or description in writing of the land or property so taken.

§ 3526.
Estate for life or years; reversionary interest.

When a railroad corporation takes land subject to an estate for life or years, the commissioners shall appraise the damages to such estate, and also the damages to the reversionary interest.

§ 3527.
Notice and statement of appraisal; record.

When an appraisal is made, the commissioners, within 20 days, shall notify the owner, if known, of the amount thereof, and deliver to the corporation a written statement of the same, with a description of the land or other property so appraised. Within 30 days thereafter, the corporation shall cause the same to be recorded in the clerk’s office of the town where the land or other estate lies.

§ 3528.
Payment or deposit of damages conveys property.

Upon the payment of the damages by the corporation, as determined upon by the commissioners, with the costs and charges thereupon accruing, or upon the deposit of the same by the corporation in such bank or with such clerk of the Supreme Court as the commissioners direct, to the credit of the person to whom the damages have been awarded, such bank or clerk giving notice personally or by mail to such persons that such deposit has been made, the corporation shall be deemed to be seized and possessed of the land or other property appraised by the commissioners.

§ 3529.
When owner is an infant or has an intellectual or psychiatric disability.

When the owner of the land or estate is an infant, or lacks capacity to protect his or her interests due to an intellectual or psychiatric disability, or does not reside in this State, or is not known, the corporation shall cause the damages sustained by the owner to be determined in the manner described in this subchapter, and shall pay the same to the lawful owner when demanded, with interest thereon. Such damages and interest shall be a specific lien upon the real estate of such corporation, and be preferred before any other demand against such corporation.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 3530.
Appeal to Superior Court.

When the corporation or the owner of land or property is dissatisfied with the decision of the commissioners, within 90 days after the date of the award either party may appeal to the Superior Court. Such court shall thereupon appoint three commissioners, one of whom shall be an inhabitant of the county in which such land or property is situated. The decision of the court shall be final upon the report of the commissioners, and costs, in the discretion of the court, may be allowed to either party. An appeal shall not be taken by the corporation after deposit of the amount of the award, nor shall an appeal be taken by the landholder or owner after acceptance thereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 3531.
Proceedings in Superior Court respecting damages.

When a railroad corporation requires for roadway or building materials land, the owner of which is unknown, or where there are conflicting claims to the title, or where such land is encumbered by mortgages, attachments, or the levy of execution, or otherwise, after having the damages appraised by the commissioners, such corporation may apply by petition to a Superior judge, who, in his or her discretion, may order the damages awarded by the commissioners to be deposited with the Clerk of the Court, or in a bank in the county where the land lies, subject to the order of such person as the Superior judge decides is entitled to the same, or subject to the future order of the Superior judge.

Parties.

Railroad company, in order to protect itself, was required to make all parties claiming title parties to proceeding under this section and have their respective rights to the money adjudicated. Wade v. Hennessy, 55 Vt. 207, 1882 Vt. LEXIS 48 (1882).

§ 3532.
Notice required before final decree.

A final decree shall not be made in such case until reasonable notice of the filing of the petition has been given to persons interested, when they are known and reside in the State. When the owners are unknown or reside outside the State, such notice shall be given as the Superior judge may order.

§ 3533.
Deposit of damages; sum invested.

On the deposit of the damages under the order of a Superior judge, the title to the land shall vest in the corporation, subject to the right of appeal as in other cases. If the sum so deposited remains for six months undemanded, a Superior judge may order the same invested for the benefit of those interested.

§ 3534.
Obstruction to private way.

If a railroad corporation obstructs the travel or means of access to a manufactory, mill, place of business, or dwelling house in laying out, building, grading, or making its road, it shall be liable to pay to the person thereby injured such reasonable compensation as the commissioners for determining railroad damages deem proper. The person so claiming to be damaged may apply in writing to the commissioners, setting forth such damage. Such application, with a notice from the commissioners to the corporation of the time and place of hearing, shall be served on the corporation according to law.

§ 3535.
Right of action on nonpayment of damages.

When a railroad corporation has entered upon and used land and real estate for the construction and accommodation of its railroad and has, by its engineers, agents, or servants, entered upon land contiguous to the railroad or the works connected to the railroad and taken materials to use in the construction of its road, and has not paid the owner for those materials nor, within two years from entry, had the damages appraised by commissioners and an award made and delivered, a person claiming damages, within six years after the entry, may bring an action for damages before a Superior Court. An answer justifying the entry under the act incorporating the company shall not bar the action, but the plaintiff shall recover only actual damages.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 57;

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3536.
Security from contractors; liability for wages.

A railroad corporation shall require sufficient security from the contractors for the payment of labor performed in constructing the road by persons in their employ. Such corporation shall be liable to the day laborers employed by the contractors for labor actually performed on its road, if the person having such claim, within 40 days after the performance of the labor, shall notify in writing the engineer in charge of the section on which the labor was performed that he or she has not been paid by the contractors.

§ 3537.
Changes in location.

After taking land for a portion of its road, a railroad corporation may vary the direction of the road in the place where such land lies, provided it does not thereby locate its road, or a part thereof, outside the limits prescribed by its act of incorporation. Before the time required by law for completing the road, such corporation shall file the location of the different parts of the road, when such variations are made, with the clerks of the respective towns where such parts are situated, who shall record the same.

§ 3538.
When other land of same owner is taken, first land to revert.

When a railroad corporation has paid or becomes liable to pay land damages for the location of its road, and afterwards changes such location and occupies other lands of the same landowner to whom damages have been paid or awarded, the land first located upon, on the completion of the subsequent location, shall revert to the landowner. On the subsequent location, the commissioners shall award such damages as under the circumstances are just.

§ 3539.
Difference in value; adjustment.

When the damages awarded on the second location are less than those awarded on the first, the corporation may recover the difference, if paid, from the landowner. If the damages so awarded have not been paid, the corporation may retain the difference and shall not be liable to pay the same. When the damages on the first location have been assessed by the commissioners and an appeal is pending, the corporation shall pay the costs accrued in the appeal, and cause its new location to be recorded, before it takes the benefit of this section.

HISTORY:

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3540.
Change after damages are paid.

When the location of a railroad is changed after the payment of damages to a landowner, and a portion of the lands of such owner is not taken for the new location, the lands taken for the first location shall revert to the owner. The railroad corporation may recover from the landowner the amount paid as damages less the damages that accrued to the owner in consequence of locating the railroad across the owner’s lands, which shall be ascertained by the Transportation Board. The landowner, if the landowner chooses, may convey to the corporation the located upon land and retain the awarded sum.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3541.
Change before damages are paid.

When the location of the road has been changed as mentioned in section 3540 of this title, and the damages have been awarded and not paid, the land first located upon shall revert to the owner thereof. The corporation shall not be required to pay the sum so awarded, but shall pay to the owner the damages which have accrued to him or her by reason of such location, to be determined by the Board.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 3542.
Right to alter highway.

When it is necessary for a railroad corporation to lay out its road upon or by the side of a highway, or upon a bridge owned by a town or the Agency of Transportation, the railroad corporation shall give notice thereof to a member of the selectboard of the town (where the proposed alteration involves a town highway) or the Secretary of Transportation (where the proposed alteration involves a State highway). When the railroad corporation cannot agree with the selectboard members or with the Agency of Transportation on a road to be worked or a bridge to be built by the railroad corporation, in place of such road or bridge, or on the amount of damages, the Transportation Board shall direct it to build such road or bridge, as a substitute for the road or bridge so located upon, as the interest of the public and the parties require. Upon the construction of such road or bridge, the road or bridge so located upon shall vest in the railroad corporation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 47.

§ 3543.
Appeal.

A railroad corporation, town, the Agency of Transportation, or individual owning land adjacent to such road or bridge so entered upon, crossed, or altered, shall have the same right of appeal from the decision of the selectboard or the Transportation Board as is provided in this chapter in case of the appraisal of land damages by commissioners.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 48.

§ 3544.
Alteration of course of highway at crossing.

A railroad corporation may alter the course of a highway where it is crossed by its railroad, for the purpose of facilitating the crossing of the same, if it can agree with the selectboard of the town (in the case of a town highway) or the Agency of Transportation (in the case of a State highway) as to such alteration or the manner of crossing. When they cannot agree, the Transportation Board shall determine the same.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 49.

§ 3545.
Alterations to be recorded.

Alterations made in a highway as provided in this chapter, if made by the Transportation Board, shall be signed by it. If such alterations are agreed upon by the parties, the agreement shall be signed by the selectboard of the town (where the alteration involves a town highway) or Secretary of Transportation (where the alteration involves a State highway), and duly recorded in the town clerk’s office.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 50.

§ 3546.
Additional lands.

A railroad corporation may take additional lands for the purposes mentioned in sections 3543–3545 of this title as the Transportation Board judges necessary. Unless the taken lands are purchased or given, compensation for the lands shall be determined by the Transportation Board, as in other cases, and made by the railroad corporation to the owners and persons interested in the lands. When compensation is made, the same shall become part of the highway, and may be held for highway purposes, and the landowners and railroad corporation shall have the same right of appeal as in other cases of land damages.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 51;

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 32, effective July 1, 2022.